Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2804
Accredited pharmacy program, defined.

An accredited pharmacy program means one approved by the board upon the recommendation of the accrediting committee of the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education. It shall be a pharmacy program which maintains at least a three-year course in pharmacy, consisting of not less than thirty-two weeks of instruction each school year. Such pharmacy program shall require as a condition to enrollment therein two full years of college or university credit. The combined course shall consist of five years of college or university credit each year of which shall consist of not less than thirty-two weeks of instruction.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 125, p. 492;

C.S.1929, § 71-1806;

Laws 1939, c. 91, § 2, p. 393;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 71-1806;

Laws 1943, c. 151, § 3, p. 553;

R.S.1943, § 71-1,146;

Laws 1971, LB 350, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 111;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 16;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,146;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 900.